New York, session 2025-2026, A3711.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subdivision 2-a of section 2 296 of the executive law, as separately amended by chapters 202 and 748 3 of the laws of 2022, are amended to read as follows: 4 (a) To refuse to sell, rent or lease or otherwise to deny to or with- 5 hold from any person or group of persons such housing accommodations 6 because of the race, creed, color, disability, national origin, citizen- 7 ship or immigration status, sexual orientation, gender identity or 8 expression, military status, age, sex, marital status, status as a 9 victim of domestic violence, lawful source of income, wage history, 10 medical history, health conditions, or familial status of such person or 11 persons, or to represent that any housing accommodation or land is not 12 available for inspection, sale, rental or lease when in fact it is so 13 available. 14 (b) To discriminate against any person because of [his or her] their 15 race, creed, color, disability, national origin, citizenship or immi- 16 gration status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, mili- 17 tary status, age, sex, marital status, status as a victim of domestic 18 violence, lawful source of income, wage history, medical history, health 19 conditions, or familial status in the terms, conditions or privileges of 20 any publicly-assisted housing accommodations or in the furnishing of 21 facilities or services in connection therewith. 22 (c) To cause to be made any written or oral inquiry or record concern- 23 ing the race, creed, color, disability, national origin, citizenship or 24 immigration status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04121-01-5 A. 3711 2 1 membership in the reserve armed forces of the United States or in the 2 organized militia of the state, age, sex, marital status, status as a 3 victim of domestic violence, lawful source of income, wage history, 4 medical history, health conditions, or familial status of a person seek- 5 ing to rent or lease any publicly-assisted housing accommodation; 6 provided, however, that nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit a 7 member of the reserve armed forces of the United States or in the organ- 8 ized militia of the state from voluntarily disclosing such membership. 9 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 296 of the executive law is amended by 10 adding a new paragraph (h) to read as follows: 11 (h) It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for any person 12 offering or providing housing accommodations, land or commercial space 13 as described in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subdivision to 14 refuse to sell, rent or lease any housing accommodation, land or commer- 15 cial space to any person because of such person's wage history, medical 16 history, or health conditions. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.